Hawaii statutes.
§558-6 Conveyance by trustee. Any
person dealing with the trustee under the recorded instrument shall take any
interest transferred by the trustee free and clear of the claims of all the
beneficiaries of the trust, and of any unrecorded separate declarations or
agreements collateral to the recorded instrument whether referred to in the
recorded instrument or not, and of anyone claiming by, through or under such
beneficiaries including, and without limiting the foregoing to, any claim
arising out of any dower or curtesy interest of the spouse of any beneficiary
thereof; provided that nothing herein contained shall prevent the beneficiary
of any unrecorded collateral declarations or agreements from enforcing the
terms of the unrecorded collateral declarations or agreements against the
trustee. [L 1978, c 151, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 232, §26]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next